Utah statutes.
13-11-7.   Duties of enforcing authority -- Confidentiality of identity of persons investigated -- Civil penalty for violation of restraining or injunctive orders.

(1)  The enforcing authority shall:

(a)  enforce this chapter throughout the state;

(b)  cooperate with state and local officials, officials of other states, and officials of the federal government in the administration of comparable statutes;

(c)  inform consumers and suppliers on a continuing basis of the provisions of this chapter and of acts or practices that violate this chapter including mailing information concerning final judgments to persons who request it, for which he may charge a reasonable fee to cover the expense;

(d)  receive and act on complaints; and

(e)  maintain a public file of final judgments rendered under this chapter that have been either reported officially or made available for public dissemination under Subsection (1)(c), final consent judgments, and to the extent the enforcing authority considers appropriate, assurances of voluntary compliance.

(2)  In carrying out his duties, the enforcing authority may not publicly disclose the identity of a person investigated unless his identity has become a matter of public record in an enforcement proceeding or he has consented to public disclosure.

(3)  On motion of the enforcing authority, or on its own motion, the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 for each day a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction issued under this chapter is violated, if the supplier received notice of the restraining or injunctive order.  Civil penalties imposed under this section shall be paid to the General Fund.



Amended by Chapter 92, 1987 General Session

